Tennessee, session 114, HB0655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-202, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(m) Subdivision (k)(1) does not apply to a new specialty earmarked license plate
authorized by § 55-4-311, § 55-4-312, § 55-4-314, this part, or part 3 of this chapter, if
the funds produced from the sale of the plate are allocated to, and used in whole or in
part by, a nonprofit organization to support the programs and operations of a site
designated as a state historic site by the Tennessee historical commission.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to new specialty earmarked license plates authorized prior to, and on or after the
effective date of this act, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0655
000099
- 1 -